Maine, session 132, LD837.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §1702, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 79, §2, is amended
to read:
10. Independent representation of the interests of the using and consuming
public. The Public Advocate, when taking a position on any matter in any proceeding or
forum pursuant to the Public Advocate's authority under this chapter, shall exercise
independent judgment to ensure the position:
A. Is consistent with the priorities established in section 1702‑A and the requirements
of this chapter; and
B. Promotes stabilization and lowering of prices paid by those members of the using
and consuming public whose interests the Public Advocate is representing.; and
C. Is consistent with the cost-effective implementation for ratepayers of the
greenhouse gas emissions reductions obligations established in Title 38, section 576-A.
Page 1 - 132LR1368(03)